Idaho, session 2026, H0738.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 30-25-201, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
30-25-201. FORMATION OF LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY -- CERTIFICATE OF
ORGANIZATION. (a) One (1) or more persons may act as organizers to form a lim-
ited liability company by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a
certificate of organization.
(b) A certificate of organization must state:
(1) The name of the limited liability company that must comply with sec-
tions 30-21-301 and 30-21-302(d), Idaho Code;
(2)(i) The street and mailing addresses of the company's principal
office; or
(ii) The street and mailing addresses of the company's commercial
registered agent if:
1. The limited liability company attests that it has no
physical location other than a residential address; and
2. The commercial registered agent maintaining the regis-
tered office consents to the use of its address as the lim-
ited liability company's principal office;
(3) The information required by section 30-21-404(a), Idaho Code;
(4) The name and mailing address of at least one (1) governor of the com-
pany; and
(5) If the company is a professional entity, a statement that the com-
pany is a professional limited liability company and the principal
profession or professions for which the company's members are duly
licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render professional ser-
vices.
(c) A certificate of organization may contain statements as to matters
other than those required by subsection (b) of this section, but may not
vary or otherwise affect the provisions specified in section 30-25-105(c)
and (d), Idaho Code, in a manner inconsistent with that section. However, a
statement in a certificate of organization is not effective as a statement
of authority. The secretary of state shall not accept operating agreements
for filing.
(d) A limited liability company is formed when the certificate of or-
ganization becomes effective.


SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.